Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2607
Sales of swine; packers; prohibited acts.

Except as provided in sections 54-2608 and 54-2609, it is unlawful for a packer purchasing or entering into a contract to purchase swine to pay or enter into a contract to pay different prices to the sellers of the swine. This section shall not be construed to mean that a price or payment method must remain fixed throughout any marketing period.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 7.